North Carolina statutes. Chapter 115D. Community Colleges.
Article 1. General Provisions for State Administration.

§ 115D-1.
Statement of purpose. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The purposes of this Chapter are to provide for the establishment, organization, and administration of a system of educational institutions throughout the State offering courses of instruction in one or more of the general areas of two-year college parallel, technical, vocational, and adult education programs, to serve as a legislative charter for such institutions, and to authorize the levying of local taxes and the issuing of local bonds for the support thereof. The major purpose of each and every institution operating under the provisions of this Chapter shall be and shall continue to be the offering of vocational and technical education and training, and of basic, high school level, academic education needed in order to profit from vocational and technical education, for students who are high school graduates or who are beyond the compulsory age limit of the public school system and who have left the public schools, provided, juveniles of any age committed to the Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety by a court of competent jurisdiction may, if approved by the director of the youth development center to which they are assigned, take courses offered by institutions of the system if they are otherwise qualified for admission.

The Community Colleges System Office is designated as the primary lead agency for delivering workforce development training, adult literacy training, and adult education programs in the State.

History.

1963, c. 448, s. 23; 1969, c. 562, s. 1; 1979, c. 462, s. 2; 1985, c. 479, s. 68; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1998-202, s. 4(p); 2000-137, s. 4(s); 2001-95, s. 5; 2005-77, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(l); 2017-186, s. 2(ggggg).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 115D-1

.

Community College Faculty Salary Plan.

Session Laws
2009-451, s. 8.1(a)-(c), provides: “(a)(1) It is the intent of the General Assembly to encourage community colleges to make faculty salaries a priority and to reward colleges that have taken steps to achieve the national average community college faculty salary, therefore:

“a. If the average faculty salary at a community college is one hundred percent (100%) or more of the national average community college faculty salary, the college may transfer up to eight percent (8%) of the State funds allocated to it for faculty salaries.

“b. If the average faculty salary at a community college is at least ninety-five percent (95%) but less than one hundred percent (100%) of the national average community college faculty salary, the college may transfer up to six percent (6%) of the State funds allocated to it for faculty salaries.

“c. If the average faculty salary at a community college is at least ninety percent (90%) but less than ninety-five percent (95%) of the national average community college faculty salary, the college may transfer up to five percent (5%) of the State funds allocated to it for faculty salaries.

“d. If the average faculty salary at a community college is at least eighty-five percent (85%) but less than ninety percent (90%) of the national average community college faculty salary, the college may transfer up to three percent (3%) of the State funds allocated to it for faculty salaries.

“e. If the average faculty salary at a community college is eighty-five percent (85%) or less of the national average community college faculty salary, the college may transfer up to two percent (2%) of the State funds allocated to it for faculty salaries.

“Except as provided by subdivision (2) of this subsection, a community college shall not transfer a greater percentage of the State funds allocated to it for faculty salaries than is authorized by this subsection.

“(2) With the approval of the State Board of Community Colleges, a community college at which the average faculty salary is eighty-five percent (85%) or less of the national average may transfer a greater percentage of the State funds allocated to it for faculty salaries than is authorized by sub-subdivision e. of subdivision (1) of this subsection. The State Board shall approve the transfer only for purposes that directly affect student services.

“The State Board of Community Colleges shall adopt guidelines to implement the provisions of this subdivision.

“(3) A local community college may use all State funds allocated to it except for Literacy Funds and Funds for Customized Training to increase faculty salaries.

“(b) As used in this section:

“(1) ‘Average faculty salary at a community college’ means the total nine-month salary from all sources of all nine-month, full-time, curriculum faculty at the college, as determined by the North Carolina Community College System on October 1 of each year.

“(2) ‘National average community college faculty salary’ means the nine-month, full-time, curriculum salary average, as published by the Integrated Postsecondary Education Data System (IPEDS), for the most recent year for which data are available.

“(c) The State Board of Community Colleges shall adopt guidelines to implement the provisions of this section.”

For similar prior provisions, see Session Laws
2007-323, ss. 8.5(a)-(g).

Investing in Innovation Grant.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 8.27(b)-(d), as amended by 2015-268, s. 3.1, provides: “(b) The federal Investing in Innovation Fund Grant: Validating Early College Strategies for Traditional Comprehensive High Schools awarded to the North Carolina New Schools Project for 2012-2020 requires students to enroll in a community college course in the tenth grade. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, specified local school administrative units may offer one community college course to participating sophomore (tenth grade) students. Participating local school administrative units are Alleghany, Beaufort, Bladen, Duplin, Hertford, Harnett, Jones, Madison, Martin, Richmond, Rutherford, Scotland, Surry, Warren, and Yancey County Schools.

“(c) Grant funds shall be used to pay for all costs incurred by the local school administrative units and the community college partners to implement the grant, including community college FTE. Community colleges shall not earn budget FTE for student course enrollments under this grant, unless the student course enrollment is otherwise authorized as provided in

G.S. 115D-20(4)

a., as amended by this act.

“(d) Research conducted as part of the federal grant program under subsection (a) of this section shall address the effects of early college strategies in preparing students for college completion. The North Carolina New Schools Project shall report on the implementation of the grant to the State Board of Education, State Board of Community Colleges, Office of the Governor, and the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee no later than March 15, 2016, and annually thereafter until the end of the grant period.”

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 8.27(a) repealed Session Laws 2013-360, s. 8.25, as amended by Session Laws 2014-100, s. 8.27, containing the former prior provisions.

§ 115D-1.
Statement of purpose. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The purposes of this Chapter are to provide for the establishment, organization, and administration of a system of educational institutions throughout the State offering courses of instruction in one or more of the general areas of two-year college parallel, technical, vocational, and adult education programs, to serve as a legislative charter for such institutions, and to authorize the levying of local taxes and the issuing of local bonds for the support thereof. The major purpose of each and every institution operating under the provisions of this Chapter shall be and shall continue to be the offering of vocational and technical education and training, and of basic, high school level, academic education needed in order to profit from vocational and technical education, for students who are high school graduates or who are beyond the compulsory age limit of the public school system and who have left the public schools, provided, juveniles of any age committed to the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety by a court of competent jurisdiction may, if approved by the director of the youth development center to which they are assigned, take courses offered by institutions of the system if they are otherwise qualified for admission.

The Community Colleges System Office is designated as the primary lead agency for delivering workforce development training, adult literacy training, and adult education programs in the State.

History.

1963, c. 448, s. 23; 1969, c. 562, s. 1; 1979, c. 462, s. 2; 1985, c. 479, s. 68; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1998-202, s. 4(p); 2000-137, s. 4(s); 2001-95, s. 5; 2005-77, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(l); 2017-186, s. 2(ggggg); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(z).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 115D-1

.

Community College Faculty Salary Plan.

Session Laws
2009-451, s. 8.1(a)-(c), provides: “(a)(1) It is the intent of the General Assembly to encourage community colleges to make faculty salaries a priority and to reward colleges that have taken steps to achieve the national average community college faculty salary, therefore:

“a. If the average faculty salary at a community college is one hundred percent (100%) or more of the national average community college faculty salary, the college may transfer up to eight percent (8%) of the State funds allocated to it for faculty salaries.

“b. If the average faculty salary at a community college is at least ninety-five percent (95%) but less than one hundred percent (100%) of the national average community college faculty salary, the college may transfer up to six percent (6%) of the State funds allocated to it for faculty salaries.

“c. If the average faculty salary at a community college is at least ninety percent (90%) but less than ninety-five percent (95%) of the national average community college faculty salary, the college may transfer up to five percent (5%) of the State funds allocated to it for faculty salaries.

“d. If the average faculty salary at a community college is at least eighty-five percent (85%) but less than ninety percent (90%) of the national average community college faculty salary, the college may transfer up to three percent (3%) of the State funds allocated to it for faculty salaries.

“e. If the average faculty salary at a community college is eighty-five percent (85%) or less of the national average community college faculty salary, the college may transfer up to two percent (2%) of the State funds allocated to it for faculty salaries.

“Except as provided by subdivision (2) of this subsection, a community college shall not transfer a greater percentage of the State funds allocated to it for faculty salaries than is authorized by this subsection.

“(2) With the approval of the State Board of Community Colleges, a community college at which the average faculty salary is eighty-five percent (85%) or less of the national average may transfer a greater percentage of the State funds allocated to it for faculty salaries than is authorized by sub-subdivision e. of subdivision (1) of this subsection. The State Board shall approve the transfer only for purposes that directly affect student services.

“The State Board of Community Colleges shall adopt guidelines to implement the provisions of this subdivision.

“(3) A local community college may use all State funds allocated to it except for Literacy Funds and Funds for Customized Training to increase faculty salaries.

“(b) As used in this section:

“(1) ‘Average faculty salary at a community college’ means the total nine-month salary from all sources of all nine-month, full-time, curriculum faculty at the college, as determined by the North Carolina Community College System on October 1 of each year.

“(2) ‘National average community college faculty salary’ means the nine-month, full-time, curriculum salary average, as published by the Integrated Postsecondary Education Data System (IPEDS), for the most recent year for which data are available.

“(c) The State Board of Community Colleges shall adopt guidelines to implement the provisions of this section.”

For similar prior provisions, see Session Laws
2007-323, ss. 8.5(a)-(g).

Investing in Innovation Grant.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 8.27(b)-(d), as amended by 2015-268, s. 3.1, provides: “(b) The federal Investing in Innovation Fund Grant: Validating Early College Strategies for Traditional Comprehensive High Schools awarded to the North Carolina New Schools Project for 2012-2020 requires students to enroll in a community college course in the tenth grade. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, specified local school administrative units may offer one community college course to participating sophomore (tenth grade) students. Participating local school administrative units are Alleghany, Beaufort, Bladen, Duplin, Hertford, Harnett, Jones, Madison, Martin, Richmond, Rutherford, Scotland, Surry, Warren, and Yancey County Schools.

“(c) Grant funds shall be used to pay for all costs incurred by the local school administrative units and the community college partners to implement the grant, including community college FTE. Community colleges shall not earn budget FTE for student course enrollments under this grant, unless the student course enrollment is otherwise authorized as provided in

G.S. 115D-20(4)

a., as amended by this act.

“(d) Research conducted as part of the federal grant program under subsection (a) of this section shall address the effects of early college strategies in preparing students for college completion. The North Carolina New Schools Project shall report on the implementation of the grant to the State Board of Education, State Board of Community Colleges, Office of the Governor, and the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee no later than March 15, 2016, and annually thereafter until the end of the grant period.”

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 8.27(a) repealed Session Laws 2013-360, s. 8.25, as amended by Session Laws 2014-100, s. 8.27, containing the former prior provisions.

Career Academies for At-Risk Students.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 6.5(a)-(c), provides: “(a) Program Established. — There is established a two-year pilot program between Cape Fear Community College (CFCC), New Hanover County Schools, and Pender County Schools to meet the needs of underserved students in seventh through ninth grade through an opportunity for extended time on CFCC's campus in various career and technical education programs. The goals of the program shall include (i) exposing students from underperforming schools and underserved populations to career training opportunities available at CFCC, (ii) guiding students toward successful career outcomes, (iii) providing support services to students, including academic tutoring, academic counseling, personal mentoring, and financial support through financial aid and scholarships, and (iv) increasing graduation and postsecondary outcomes for these students.

“(b) Components of the Program. — CFCC, New Hanover County Schools, and Pender County Schools shall offer a summer career academy program to at-risk students from each local school administrative unit for a total of up to 300 students in seventh through ninth grade. The career academy program shall introduce students to life on a college campus with the goal of creating a familiarity with and positive experience in the postsecondary environment. Students shall visit two career and technical education programs per day for five consecutive days for two consecutive weeks in different subject areas, such as welding, marine technology and boat building, electrical, culinary, medical assisting, public safety, arts, veterinary assisting, and chemical technology. The career academy program shall include speakers and support for financial aid and scholarship opportunities and an introduction to the Career and College Promise Program.

“CFCC shall also hire career liaisons in time-limited positions for placement in certain middle schools in New Hanover County Schools and Pender County Schools to support at-risk students. The goal of adding career liaisons to the schools shall be to provide students with exposure to career and technical education opportunities that otherwise would not be available to them.

“(c) Report. — CFCC, in collaboration with New Hanover County Schools and Pender County Schools, shall submit an initial report by October 1, 2022, and a final report by October 1, 2023, to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee, the Senate Appropriations Committee on Education/Higher Education, the House Appropriations Committee on Education, and the Fiscal Research Division on the results of the pilot program and the placement of the career liaisons in schools to support at-risk students, including the number of students who enrolled in Career and College Promise Program pathways following completion of the career academy program and other relevant student outcome data for at-risk students.”

§§ 115D-1.1,
115D-1.2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 7.1A(f), effective January 1, 2012.

History.

S. 115D-1.1; 2001-312, s. 2; 2001-487, s. 76; 2005-77, ss. 2, 3; 2009-46, s. 1; repealed by 2011-145, s. 7.1A(f), effective January 1, 2012. s. 115D-1.2; 2007-323, s. 7.27(j); 2009-451, s. 7.10(i); repealed by 2011-145, s. 7.1A(f), effective January 1, 2012.

§ 115D-1.3.
Accreditation of secondary school located in North Carolina shall not be a factor in admissions, loans, scholarships, or other educational policies.

For purposes of this section, the term “accreditation” shall include certification or any other similar approval process.

The State Board of Community Colleges shall adopt a policy that prohibits any community college from soliciting or using information regarding the accreditation of a secondary school located in North Carolina that a person attended as a factor affecting admissions, loans, scholarships, or other educational activity at the community college, unless the accreditation was conducted by a State agency.

History.

2011-306, s. 2.

§ 115D-2.
Definitions.

As used in this Chapter:

The “administrative area” of an institution comprises the county or counties directly responsible for the local financial support and local administration of such institution as provided in this Chapter.

The term “community college” is defined as an educational institution operating under the provisions of this Chapter and dedicated primarily to the educational needs of the service area which it serves, and may offer

The freshmen and sophomore courses of a college of arts and sciences, authorized by

G.S. 115D-4.1

;

Organized credit curricula for the training of technicians; curricular courses may carry transfer credit to a senior college or university where the course is comparable in content and quality and is appropriate to a chosen course of study;

Vocational, trade, and technical specialty courses and programs, and

Courses in general adult education.

The term “institution” refers to any institution established pursuant to this Chapter.

The term “regional institution” means an institution whose service area as assigned by the State Board of Community Colleges includes three or more counties; provided, however, any institution receiving funds as a regional institution on May 1, 1987, shall continue to receive funds on that basis.

The term “State Board” refers to the State Board of Community Colleges.

The “tax-levying authority” of an institution is the board of commissioners of the county or all of the boards of commissioners of the counties, jointly, which constitute the administrative area of the institution.

Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 564, s. 1.

“Vending facilities” has the same meaning as it does in

G.S. 111-42(d)

, but also means any mechanical or electronic device dispensing items or something of value or entertainment or services for a fee, regardless of the method of activation, and regardless of the means of payment, whether by coin, currency, tokens, or other means.

History.

1963, c. 448, s. 23; 1969, c. 562, s. 2; 1973, c. 590, s. 1; 1979, c. 462, s. 2; c. 553; c. 896, s. 1; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1130, s. 1; 1983, c. 761, s. 104; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 169; 1987, c. 564, s. 1; 1999-84, s. 1; 2005-103, s. 4; 2006-203, s. 35.

§ 115D-2.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-90, s. 25.2(b), effective July 22, 2021.

History.

1979, c. 896, s. 2; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1130, s. 5; 1981, c. 47, s. 8; c. 474; 1983, c. 311; c. 479, ss. 1-3; 1985, c. 227, ss. 1-5; c. 428; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1102, s. 2; 1991, c. 83, s. 1; 1993, c. 69, s. 2; 1995, c. 192, s. 1; c. 470, ss. 3, 4; 1997-456, ss. 18, 19; 1999-61, ss. 1, 2; 1999-84, s. 7; 2006-31, s. 1; 2006-201, s. 2(c); 2007-278, s. 3; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1; repealed by 2021-90, s. 25.2(b), effective July 22, 2021.

Cross References.

As to present similar provisions, see

G.S. 115D-2.2

.

§ 115D-2.2.
State Board of Community Colleges.

The State Board of Community Colleges is established.

The State Board of Community Colleges shall consist of 22 members, as follows:

The Lieutenant Governor or the Lieutenant Governor’s designee shall be a member ex officio.

The Treasurer of North Carolina or the Treasurer’s designee shall be a member ex officio.

The Commissioner of Labor or the Commissioner’s designee shall be a member ex officio.

The Governor shall appoint to the State Board four members from the State at large and one member from each of the six Trustee Association Regions defined in

G.S. 115D-62

. Each appointment by the Governor shall be for a term of four years and until a successor is appointed and qualifies. Any vacancy occurring among the Governor’s appointees before the expiration of term shall be filled by appointment of the Governor. The member appointed to fill a vacancy shall meet the same residential qualification, if any, as the vacating member and shall serve for the remainder of the unexpired term of that member.

The General Assembly shall elect eight members of the State Board from the State at large to a term of four years and until a successor is elected and qualifies. The Senate shall elect four members and the House of Representatives shall elect four members in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.

The person serving as president of the North Carolina Comprehensive Community College Student Government Association shall be an ex officio member of the State Board. If the president of the Association is unable for any reason to serve as the student member of the State Board, then pursuant to the constitution of the Association, the vice-president of the Association shall serve as the student member of the State Board. Any person serving as the student member of the State Board must be a student in good standing at a North Carolina community college. The student member of the State Board shall have all the rights and privileges of membership, except that the student member shall not have a vote.

At each session of the General Assembly held in an odd-numbered year, the Senate and the House of Representatives shall elect from a slate of candidates made in each chamber. The slate shall be prepared as provided by resolution in each chamber. If a sufficient number of nominees who are legally qualified are submitted, then the slate of candidates shall list at least twice the number of candidates for the total seats open. All qualified candidates shall compete against all other qualified candidates. All candidates shall submit a statement of economic interest to the State Ethics Commission for review under

G.S. 138A-24

.

When a vacancy occurs among the members elected by the two chambers of the General Assembly, the chamber that originally elected the vacating member shall elect a person to fill the vacancy in the same manner as required for election under subsection (c) of this section when the General Assembly next convenes. The election shall be for the remainder of the unexpired term.

Upon receipt of a referral from the State Ethics Commission in accordance with G.S. 138A-12(m) concerning a member of the State Board of Community Colleges, the principal clerk of the chamber of the General Assembly receiving the referral shall immediately refer the matter to the committee selected pursuant to subsection (c) of this section. That committee may recommend to that chamber a resolution providing for the removal of the Board member. If the committee’s proposed resolution is adopted by a majority of the members present and voting of that chamber, the public servant shall be removed, and the seat previously held by that Board member becomes vacant.

No person may be appointed or elected to more than two consecutive terms of four years on the State Board. Election or appointment to a partial term to fill a vacancy does not count toward the term limitation.

No member of the General Assembly, no officer or employee of the State, and no officer or employee of an institution under the jurisdiction of the State Board shall be eligible to serve on the State Board. No spouse of a member of the General Assembly or of an officer or employee of the Community College System or of an institution under the jurisdiction of the State Board shall be eligible to serve on the State Board. No person who within the prior five years has been an employee of the Community Colleges System Office shall be eligible to serve on the State Board.

At its first meeting after July 1 of each odd-numbered year, the State Board shall elect from its membership a chair and such other officers as it may deem necessary.

The State Board of Community Colleges shall meet at stated times established by the State Board, but not less frequently than 10 times a year. The State Board of Community Colleges shall also meet with the State Board of Education and the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina at least once a year to discuss educational matters of mutual interest and to recommend to the General Assembly such policies as are appropriate to encourage the improvement of public education at every level in this State; these joint meetings shall be hosted by the three Boards according to the schedule set out in G.S. 115C-11(b1). Special meetings of the State Board may be set at any regular meeting or may be called by the chair. A majority of the qualified members of the State Board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

Whenever any vacancy shall occur in the appointed or elected membership of the State Board, the chair shall inform the appropriate appointing or electing authority of the vacancy.

The State Board of Community Colleges may declare vacant the office of an appointed or elected member who does not attend three consecutive scheduled meetings without justifiable excuse. The chair of the State Board shall notify the appropriate appointing or electing authority of any vacancy.

History.

2021-90, s. 25.2(a); 2021-133, s. 2.

§ 115D-3.
Community Colleges System Office; staff; reorganization authority.

The Community Colleges System Office shall be a principal administrative department of State government under the direction of the State Board of Community Colleges, and shall be separate from the free public school system of the State, the State Board of Education, and the Department of Public Instruction. The State Board has authority to adopt and administer all policies, regulations, and standards which it deems necessary for the operation of the System Office.The State Board shall elect a President of the North Carolina System of Community Colleges who shall serve as chief administrative officer of the Community Colleges System Office. The compensation of this position shall be fixed by the State Board from funds provided by the General Assembly in the Current Operations Appropriations Act.The President shall be assisted by such professional staff members as may be deemed necessary to carry out the provisions of this Chapter, who shall be elected by the State Board on nomination of the President. The compensation of the staff members elected by the Board shall be fixed by the State Board of Community Colleges, upon recommendation of the President of the Community College System, from funds provided in the Current Operations Appropriations Act. These staff members shall include such officers as may be deemed desirable by the President and State Board. Provision shall be made for persons of high competence and strong professional experience in such areas as academic affairs, public service programs, business and financial affairs, institutional studies and long-range planning, student affairs, research, legal affairs, health affairs and institutional development, and for State and federal programs administered by the State Board. In addition, the President shall be assisted by such other employees as may be needed to carry out the provisions of this Chapter, who shall be subject to the provisions of Chapter 126 of the General Statutes. The staff complement shall be established by the State Board on recommendation of the President to insure that there are persons on the staff who have the professional competence and experience to carry out the duties assigned and to insure that there are persons on the staff who are familiar with the problems and capabilities of all of the principal types of institutions represented in the system. The State Board of Community Colleges shall have all other powers, duties, and responsibilities delegated to the State Board of Education affecting the Community Colleges System Office not otherwise stated in this Chapter.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the President may reorganize the System Office in accordance with recommendations and plans submitted to and approved by the State Board of Community Colleges. If a reorganization is implemented pursuant to this subsection, including any movement of positions and funds between fund codes on a recurring basis, the President shall report by June 30 of the fiscal year in which the reorganization occurred to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee and the Fiscal Research Division of the General Assembly.

History.

1963, c. 448, s. 23; 1971, c. 1244, s. 14; 1975, c. 699, s. 5; 1979, c. 462, s. 2; c. 896, s. 3; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1130, ss. 1, 2; 1981, c. 859, s. 35.2; 1983, c. 479, s. 4; c. 717, s. 26; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 164; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 955, ss. 19, 20; 1987, c. 564, s. 2; 1993, c. 522, s. 6; 1999-84, s. 8; 2019-235, s. 3.1.

§ 115D-4.
Establishment of institutions.

The establishment of all community colleges shall be subject to the approval of the General Assembly upon recommendation of the State Board of Community Colleges. In no case, however, shall favorable recommendation be made by the State Board for the establishment of an institution until it has been demonstrated to the satisfaction of the State Board that a genuine educational need exists within a proposed administrative area, that existing public and private post-high school institutions in the area will not meet the need, that adequate local financial support for the institution will be provided, that public schools in the area will not be affected adversely by the local financial support required for the institution, and that funds sufficient to provide State financial support of the institution are available.

History.

1963, c. 448, s. 23; 1965, c. 1028; 1971, c. 1244, s. 14; 1977, c. 154, s. 1; 1979, c. 462, s. 2; c. 896, s. 4; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1130, s. 1; 1983, c. 717, ss. 27-27.2; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 955, s. 21; 1987, c. 564, s. 3; 2006-203, s. 36; 2009-229, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-229, s. 1, effective June 30, 2009, and applicable to design, construction, repair, or renovation projects for which bids or proposals are solicited on or after April 30, 2010, deleted “capital improvements” from the end of the section catchline, and deleted the former second paragraph, which read: “The expenditures of any State funds for any capital improvements of existing institutions shall be subject to the prior approval of the State Board of Community Colleges and the Governor. The expenditure of State funds at any institution herein authorized to be approved by the State Board shall be subject to the terms of the State Budget Act unless specifically otherwise provided in this Chapter.”